Washington statutes.
RCW 18.280.140

Civil infractions.

The department has the authority to issue civil infractions under chapter 7.80 RCW in the following instances:

(1) Conducting or offering to conduct a home inspection without being licensed in accordance with this chapter;

(2) Presenting or attempting to use as his or her own the home inspector license of another;

(3) Giving any false or forged evidence of any kind to the director or his or her authorized representative in obtaining a license;

(4) Falsely impersonating any other licensee; or

(5) Attempting to use an expired or revoked license.

All fines and penalties collected or assessed by a court because of a violation of this section must be remitted to the department to be deposited into the business and professions account created in RCW 43.24.150.

[ 2008 c 119 s 14.]